Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1915.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 327(a) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 327. Junior hunter projects.(a) General rule.--It shall be the duty of the commission to initiate, implement and administer two or more junior license hunter projects and a youth antlered deer season for the purpose of increasing and sustaining interest in hunting among young persons of this Commonwealth. Except for the requirement to actually hold a junior hunting license under section 2705(2) or (9) (relating to classes of licenses), or hold a permit issued by the commission entitling a person 12 years of age or younger to hunt alongside a mentor, and as may otherwise be modified by 123456789101112131415161718 commission regulations, all participants in any junior hunter project shall comply with all of the provisions of this title and the regulations promulgated hereunder.* * *(c) Youth antlered deer season.--(1) The commission shall establish a youth antlered deer season of up to five continuous days prior to the start of the regular firearms deer season.(2) A junior hunting license issued under section 2705(2) or (9) or a permit issued by the commission entitling a person 12 years of age or younger to hunt alongside a mentor shall entitle the holder of the license or permit to one antlered deer tag to be used during the youth antlered deer season.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1915PN2397 - 2 - 123456789101112131415